Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
Number of Reviews
29

Author
Michael Elliott
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Tom Tykwer
STARRING:         Franka Potente, Moritz Bleibtreu, Herbert Knaup, Nina
Petri
WRITTEN BY:       Tom Tykwer
RATED:            R for sex, violence, and profanity
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       2 Thessalonians 1:11, 1 Thessalonians 1:7, Titus 2:6-8
What we have here is a simple matter of style over substance. RUN LOLA
RUN, a 1998 German film which is beginning to make its way across the US,
playing in art houses and film festivals, does not have much of a story
but what it has, it tells very well.
Writer/director Tom Tykwer (WINTER SLEEPER) has taken a basic plot line,
multiplied it by three, added a techno-rock musical score and used many
inventive camera techniques to keep us riveted to the story (even though,
as I've said, there's not much of a story there.)
It all begins when Lola gets a phone call from her boyfriend, Manni.
Engaged in some shady drug deal, he finds himself owing 100,000 marks to a
man who would just as soon kill him as sneeze in his direction.  If Manni
doesn't come up with the money in 20 minutes, he's a dead man.  And with
that piece of information, Lola is off and running.
Dashing through the streets of Berlin, trying to think up a way to get
that kind of money that quickly, she rushes past people and events almost
without acknowledging their existence.
20 minutes later we see the outcome of her mad run and the results of the
decisions she made along the way.  The ending may disappoint many in the
audience but there's no need for despair.  The movie is a long way from
over.
Just like that, we're back at the phone call that began it all and once
again, Lola is off and running.  This time however, a slight delay in the
beginning results in some major differences down the road.  As we have
heard elsewhere, timing is everything.  Lola is forced to make decisions
she didn't have to make in the "first run" because she arrived at various
places a few seconds earlier or later.  Again, we play the story out to
its conclusion to find out what happens when the 20 minute deadline
expires.
Still not happy with the outcome?  Let us go back to the phone and again,
Lola will take off running.  And once again, slight changes early on in
the run have a major impact in the end result.  Clearly, the point being
made is that our lives consist of millions of such minuscule moments which
add to the overall course of our lives.  For the third time, we take the
story all the way to its ultimate conclusion.
What makes the movie work is the stylistic approach of Mr. Tykwer.  He
uses many camera tricks to heighten the enjoyment of the film.  Split
screen, stop action, slo-mo, animation mixed with live action...he
includes it all.  There is no getting bored with Mr. Tykwer at the helm of
the film.
The music by Reinhold Heil is techno rock at its best:  pounding bass,
rhythmic beat, and all.  During each run, there is no slowdown in the
action.  The urgency of the situation is pressed upon all we see.
However, in between each run are short segments with a calmer, more
intimate Lola and Manni, engaging in the silly and endearing pillow talk
of a couple obviously in love.
Franka Potente (AM I BEAUTIFUL?) is Lola, hair dyed an unnaturally red
color (which takes on the look of flames streaming off her head as she
runs full blast through the streets of Berlin.)  With a scream that could
(and does) shatter glass, Lola is truly a memorable character.
One of the themes that runs throughout the film is the impact our lives
have with others even though we may only slightly interact with them.
Whether we are aware of it or not, we leave a mark wherever we go.
Whether that mark is a good one, inspiring and encouraging to others, or a
negative one, harmful and detrimental to others, is entirely up to us and
the way we conduct our lives.
God commands us to behave ourselves worthy of His calling, as His
ambassadors on this earth.  The impression we make should remind others of
the glory and goodness of God.  Lola and Manni are not God's
representatives, nor do they present themselves as such.  But they do
illustrate how one life can affect many others.  If they leave negative
impacts, we can leave positive ones.  All it takes is an awareness and a
willingness to live for God and the fortitude to do it.

Author
Jerry Saravia
German director Tom Tykwer's "Run Lola Run" is the first truly great pop
fantasy since Tarantino's "Pulp Fiction," a high-octane, bizarrely moving,
sensual, energetic film of such distinct purity that it is impossible to put it
out of your mind.
The film stars Franka Potente as Lola, a flaming red-haired drug dealer's
girlfriend whose life always seems to be on the go. Within the first couple of
minutes, Lola is engaged in a frantic search for 100,000 marks to save her
boyfriend, Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) from getting killed by gangsters. It is
money that Manni owes to a gangster but he inadvertenly left it in a subway,
where it might have gotten in the hands of a homeless person! Lola has
precisely twenty minutes to come up with the money. She tries to consult her
father, who works as an executive at a bank, and he may or may not be of any
help to her. In the meantime, Manni considers robbing a supermarket, which is a
post-Tarantino cliche to be sure ...but writer-director Tykwer has some sly
tricks up his sleeve.
"Run Lola Run" is not content with all things formal and conventional, and so
in a shrewd move, the 20-minute event is repeated twice. What? How can this be
interesting? Well, instead of just merely repeating the timely events at random
as "Pulp Fiction," "Go" and the noir classic "The Killing" did, we get
different outcomes, realizations, and coincidences with each interval. Tykwer
operates under the theory that Lola imagines there are alternating time lines,
and likewise, so does Manni. In a sense, it closely resembles "Groundhog
Day"...avoiding the same problems and sidestepping others each time the
desperate Lola runs trying to find the inordinate sum of money.
"Run Lola Run" has plenty of visual tricks and superbly crafted camera moves in
every frame, and plenty of surprises along its festive way. We get the homeless
man who becomes a major character in one event, Lola (who does enough running
to qualify for the Olympics) always managing to run past a group of nuns, and
there are the people on the street she almost runs into. Each time Lola marches
past them, a different life is mapped out shown in unobtrusive flash cuts.
There is Manni's decision to rob a supermarket if Lola does not make it on
time, though something always manages to occur to intrude upon that
possibility. So we get car accidents, animated intervals of Lola running, banks
held up, fierce dogs, astonished casino gamblers, shootings, lifelong decisions
involving parentage, bicyclists trying to pitch bike sales, and plenty of
heart-pumping songs and sounds to emphasize Lola's fervent task at hand. Each
timely event is played out with unpredictable twists and at the end, there is a
greater sense of optimism that supersedes that of "Go."  
Franka Ponette is a startlingly alive newcomer, brimming with a substance and
energy unseen in cinema screens this year. Her flame-red hairdo has already
inspired may German girls - even the title has proved inspiring for Hillary
Clinton's race for senator. She has sweet, delectable chemistry with the
soft-spoken Moritz Bleibtreu - their bedroom chats highlighted by bright red
hues is as touching and heartrending as any Julia Roberts romance. Those scenes
comfortably reminded me of some of the flashing red color flashes at the
beginning of Bertolucci's "The Conformist." 
>From the incredible overhead shot where a crowd forms the title of the film,
"Run Lola Run" is a masterpiece of cinematic invention and circumstance -
actively playing the audience like a piano. It is indeed the most pleasurable
pop film of the year. And Ponette is the shining moral force of the film - in
her desperation and her surefire confidence, she makes us believe there are
alternatives to any life-threatening event. Bravo, Lola, Bravo!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   What would have happened if Lee Harvey Oswald missed? 
With JFK finishing out his term, the Vietnam War might have
been over almost before it began.  The hippie movement may
never have ushered in a massive challenges of authority,
and the U.S.--perhaps the entire Western World--might have
retained the innocence of the 1950s.  Go back a little further. 
What if Gavrilo Princip missed Austrian Archduke Franz
Ferdinand on June 28, 1914?  World War I could have been
avoided.  Russia would not have had a communist revolution. 
With Germany no longer needing to make up for its defeat,
World War II would not have occurred.  Amazing, isn't it,
what world-shaking changes could have taken place had the
aim of two mentally disturbed marksmen been a bit off?
   Getting down to a smaller scale, let's talk about you.  How
would you be different if you and your future spouse had not
bumped into each other when you were both crossing that
street after a day of shopping?  Or how about that time in
1993 when you called your broker and ordered 1000 shares
of plain old American Telephone and Telegraph instead of an
equal allocation of America Online?  If you had simply said
"AOL" instead of AT&T, you'd be driving a Ferrari today
instead of a Dodge Neon.  What a difference a day
makes.
   And what a fascinating idea for a movie!  "Now I long for
yesterday" has been the theme of two fairly dependable films
recently: Peter Howitt's "Twice Upon a Yesterday" and Maria
Ripoli's "Sliding Doors," and some years back the subject of
the hilarious Bill Murray vehicle, "Groundhog Day."  But none
of these three predecessors shares the particularly dynamic
style of Tom Tykwer's incredibly fast-paced "Run Lola Run,"
which was justifiably a favorite at its North American
introductions at the Toronto Film Festival in 1998 and more
recently the Sundance Festival in Utah.  Though a bit of a
stretch, call this presentation the human equivalent of Anakin
Skywalker's pod race in George Lucas's "Phantom Menace,"
in that its central character spends a good deal of her time
running--not like a yuppie jogger but as though her life
depended on her velocity.  And indeed, her boy friend's
existence does depend on her ability to accelerate on foot
from 0 to 20 with scarcely a moment for a breather.  Like the
aforementioned movies, "Lola" has multiple outcomes--three,
in fact--in each case its title character entreating the gods to
get it right (like Bill Murray, Gwyneth Paltrow, Lena Headey
and Douglas Henshall in the aforementioned movies) and
yield the happy ending we in the audience wish for its
likeable characters.
   Write-director Tom Tykwer opens his swiftly-paced work by
quoting a few philosphers' takes on the meaning of life, then
kicks a metaphoric soccer ball into the heavens to start the
fun.  Lola (Franka Potente) receives a frantic phone call from
her boy friend, Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu), who is desperate. 
Through his sheer, bubble-headed ineptitude Manni, who is a
courier for a gangster, has mislaid a bag full of money that he
is scheduled to deliver to his boss in just twenty minutes.  If
he cannot come up with the 100,000 marks, he will be killed. 
Somehow he trusts his girl to dig up the booty within that
span of time and save his life.  If Lola does not show up real
soon, he will rob the supermarket across the street.
   The story is told three separate times.  In each case,
something different happens to Lola that has a marked effect
on the outcome of the story.  Each time she asks her father,
a high-ranking bank executive, to give her the sizable amount
of money.  And each time the result is distinctive, profoundly
altering the course of the endeavor.  While Franka Potente,
with her flaming red hair, is the center of the film, director
Tykwer does some interesting stuff with the side characters. 
Just as Lola's course of action in each take leads to a distinct
outcome, so the activities of the people she literally runs into
cause a kaleidoscopic array of aftermaths.  But Tykwer
flashes these hypothetical consequences before us so quickly
that if you blink you will miss what is conceivably the most
original and hilarious parts of the film.
   In a director's statement, Tykwer announces his intention. 
"I always start with the image...I start wanting to get it
moving, to build a story around it and then make a film out of
it....it's when people move that they express things: despair,
happiness, or whatever."  In other words, Tykwer believes as
many of us do that the last thing we want to see in the
movies is talking heads--which is why photographed plays so
often fail when adapted for the screen.  
   "Run Lola Run" is loaded with cinematic effects that in the
hands of someone less professional than Tykwer could have
come across as the work of an NYU film student: jump cuts,
rapid pans, changes from video to film stock, and the
interjection of animation that clones the activities of the real
human beings.  All of this works well because Tykwer has an
uncanny ability to manipulate these images and what's more
he has composed a thumping soundtrack that causes a film
already on steroids to pump up the audience heartbeats.  
   While "Run Lola Run" is to a great extent a director's film,
Tykwer could not have succeeded as he does without the
electrifying young Frankie Potente whose painted, raggedy-
Ann hairstyle could capture the attention of a teen audience
just as the entire work secures the regard of film buffs of all
ages.  Distinguished Internet critic James Berardinelli says in
his review, "it's the most fun I have had at any movie thus far
in 1999."  Amen to that.

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Franka Potente, Moritz Bleibtreu and Herbert Knaup
Synopsis: 
In a phone call Lola (Franka Potente) learns that her boyfriend Manni
(Moritz Bleibtreu) will be killed by a drug dealer unless she and Manni
cough up 100,000 deutschemarks in the next 20 minutes. This sends Lola on a
frantic dash for cash to the accompaniment of mod music and scenes of a lot
of running (hence the title RUN LOLA RUN). 
Opinion:
Remember the film GROUNDHOG DAY where Bill Murray played Phil, the
sarcastic weatherman who got to redo the day several times until he finally
performed the day the magical way it was fated to happen? Same deal here,
only instead of Phil the sarcastic weatherman we get the MTV treatment. We
cheer for Lola the cute, hyperkinetic, screaming punker girl with army
boots, tatoos, and color-dyed hair as she high tails it to Daddy's bank.
Lola's got 20 minutes to succeed, the stakes are deadly, and she doesn't
get as many chances as Phil did. It makes for a fun and quirky collage as
small details happen right and left which change fate like shards in a
kaleidoscope.
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Eugene Novikov
With the abundance of trite, recycled movies in the late '90s, there is a
tremendous demand by movie lovers (never mind movie critics) for movies that
present the wide film audience with something truly original: perhaps
audaciously, perhaps purely thematically. For the former, you need look no
further than director Tom Tykwer's incredible German thriller Run Lola Run, a
movie that may make some viewers need a cooling off period afterwards. Lola,
a contemporary Goth-girl with blazing red hair receives a desperate phone
call from her boyfriend Manni one day. It seems that because she was late
delivering something he lost a bag containing a hundred thousand Marks, and
if he doesn't deliver a hundred thousand marks within the next twenty
minutes, he will be killed. This gives Lola twenty minutes to come up with
100,000 marks, or her boyfriend dies. So she runs -- not just jogs, sprints
-- in hopes that somehow, someway, she'll be able to obtain the money and
save a life.
>From there, as critic Steve Rhodes described it, Run Lola Run plays a bit
like "Sliding Doors on steroids. With a non-stop techno soundtrack, wierd
camerawork, all kinds of insane zooms and a truly breakneck pace, anyone that
is bored with Run Lola Run has to be smoking something. Indeed, the movie is
often outrageously exciting, as well as bitterly ironic and subtly serious.
Very much like Titanic, Run Lola Run is an achievement with filmmaking much
more than it is an achievement in film. The way the movie is made, for pure
visual style, Tykwer's movie is breathtaking (literally, sometimes).
Thematically it does leave something to be desired; it toys around with some
intriguing ideas but does occasionally seem as if there is little substance
behind all of the flash.
While you are watching, this will not matter. Running a breezy 81 minutes,
this is one movie I wished was longer because it was so damn good while it
lasted. It is the equivalent of a roller-coaster in the amount of thrills and
fun that it offers. Š1999 Eugene Novikov
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Jon Ridge
     Once the technique - same scenario, three different
ways ­ has been established, RUN LOLA RUN loses its novelty
effect.  Thatšs unfortunate, as Tom Tykweršs tale of lovers
against the clock, I think, had some degree of potential.
Then again, what more is actually going on, here, than device?
Lola (Franka Potente) is given a very specific deadline by her
boyfriend, Manni (Moritz Bleibtreau):  show up at a phone booth
downtown with 100,000 deutsche marks in exactly 20 minutes, or
he will rob a supermarket across the street.  He owes this sum ­
which was hastily left behind by him on a subway train ­ to a
gangster, forget why, whom he fears will kill him if not produced.
Lola insists (screams, actually) that he not do anything rash,
and vows to come up with the money, somehow, on her own in time
to save him.  What follows is a series of montages with red-haired
Lola running furiously down the streets of Berlin, seeking out
her father for a loan, and the several different outcomes of
various strangers she encounters along the way.
I enjoyed the filmmakeršs style, up to a point, using smash-
cuts and animation and continuous techno music to create a dizzying,
breathless atmosphere.  It works, invigorates us, and then quickly
fizzles.  Why?  The film is a mere 80-something minutes long, and
shouldšve been able to sustain its energy.  But, somehow, it
doesnšt.  One too many "and, then.." segments, perhaps; or, little
to no actual character arc (though, how much can one reasonably
expect from this premise).  I found myself not caring in the least
whether or not Lola would make it to her destination as scheduled,
or the outcome of a subplot involving her father and his mistress,
while at the same time admiring the filmšs construction.  Flip-
flopping time lines are always intriguing, and RUN LOLA RUN is
playful in this regard.  My favorite sequences are the purgatory-
esque ones between Lola and Manni, after one of them has been
killed; the dialogue is simple and contemplative when all we do
is lay in bed and listen to these characters speculate on the
importance, one way or another, of their relationship.  There is
also a rather feverish scene in a casino, which contains the single
funniest line of dialogue, and acts as a sort of culmination for
every ounce of steam the film has spent its time working up.
More often than not, though, the film refuses to rest.  Not
necessarily a bad thing, mind you, but after a while I just got
antsy:  see the old lady on the phone who needs shampoo; see Lola
run; watch as the street people have their fates altered depending
on whether cartoon Lola can avoid the dog on the staircase.
The film explores almost every single angle of the plot, leaving
nothing to question about any of it, until all wešre left with is
inventive editing.  Had RUN LOLA RUN been half as ingenious with
its story, as it is, for the most part, with its storytelling,
this couldšve been a remarkable achievement.
     Best line:  comes when Lola is trying to get in to the casino;
she asks how this works, and the clerk says something along the
lines of, "You put money down for chips, and then gamble it away."

Author
Paul X Foley
`Run Lola Run' is a thoroughly likable film, a hyperactive
visual treat that combines 35mm with video, stills, and animation.
Combined with a satisfying story line and some deliciously understated
acting, it's far and away my favorite movie of the summer.
A lot has been said about this film's fast paced visual style.  It
has even been compared (unfairly, I think) to a video game.  At its
heart, though, is a classic dramatic structure.  The plot is simple:
Lola's lover, a small-time hood named Manni, has managed to get
himself in desperate trouble.  They have twenty minutes to come up
with the100,000 DM of mobster's money that he has lost.  The
frantic race to the finish tests, and reveals, character.  Revelations
are made, tension is built up and released.
What's not so classical is that the same race is run three times;
it's as if the characters have the ability to rewind and re-do
until they get it right.  Basically, Lola tells Manni to wait where he
is and not do anything until she gets there; she then sprints across
town to her father's bank to try to get the money out of him.  Each
version plays out almost, but not quite, the same as the previous
ones.  And it's these small differences that make all the
difference.
What we have here is theme and variations.  There's a musical
analogy.  And it's no coincidence that the film's writer and
producer, Tom Tykwer, also composed the soundtrack.  Pace and rhythm
are crucial to making this movie work; it isn't all run at
breakneck pace, there are also times when the action comes to a full
stop, the visual equivalents of silence.  And quiet moments.  The
on-screen pace directly evokes mood in the audience.
This isn't an empty-headed summertime entertainment that requires
you to put your brain in neutral.  At the risk of sounding pretentious
and pedantic (and the movie itself is neither), there are some Big
Issues raised, questions of free will versus the predetermined, of
fate versus chaos.  How much control do the characters have over these
events, and how much is pure randomness?  Lola bursts into her
father's office, surprising him in the company of his mistress.
This scene plays out twice; in the later version, a single further
line of dialogue has time to pass between the couple, one line that
changes everything, that drastically alters the events that follow.
While on the other hand there is an unfortunate motorist who in all
three versions, no matter what else happens differently, seems fated
to slam his car into the pristine white BMW belonging to three very
large and angry looking toughs.
`Run Lola Run' is very funny at times; it also has a strong
`Thelma and Louise' quality that makes it impossible not to like
Lola and to hope that she'll win.  Guns are drawn and sometimes
they go off, as guns will.  Sometimes a gun in the hand means having
the world by the tail, sometimes it spells tragedy.  There is no
moralizing here, it's plain story-telling.  With some delightful
twists.
Lola's character is so likable, so capable and determined, that I
found myself bothered by her seeming willingness to sacrifice herself
for Manni, who is kind of a loser and certainly not the brightest bulb
on the tree.  You don't have to be a rabid feminist to be bothered
by seeing a smart woman cast in the role of a martyr to love.  But my
objection was answered by a scene halfway into the movie, a flashback
involving some sweet, funny, and touching pillow talk between the two.
In a nutshell it explains the relationship and what's in it for
her.  Manni makes her happy, and she'd rather he didn't end up
with a bullet behind the ear.
Franka Potente, as Lola, is a joy to watch.  Many key moments have no
dialogue; it's all spelled out by the expression on her face as she
reacts to events.  Running through the streets of Berlin, she
sometimes talks to herself, a kind of incantation, almost a prayer,
willing things to work out for her.  She also literally screams in
frustration, a high-pitched, glass-shattering wail that goes on
forever, a release of the primal energy that the character seems to
have a gross abundance of.
`Run Lola Run' is proof that a smart film can also be loads of fun.

Author
Frankie Paiva
"The ball is round and the game lasts for 90 minutes, everything else is
theroy." A soccer ball is kicked up into the air, and it's what begins this
madcap, incredibly original tale of fast-paced running and love. Lola (Potente)
has 20 minutes to deliver the 100,000 marks that her boyfriend, Manni
(Bleibtreu) has left on the subway. If he does not deliver them to his gangster
boss on time, he will be killed. The movie plays out in three different ways
each of them are special in their own way.
One: Thinking of the people in her life that have a lot of money, Lola sprints
to her father's bank and interrupts a private meeting there.
Two: Lola attemps to rob the bank (definately the best of the three) to get her
money.
Three: Lola tries her luck at the casino.
The best parts of the movie come in fast photos of the people she passes by on
the street. For instance, after banging into a women walking with a stroller
the screen lights up in flashes that show her stealing the child from the real
parents. Other flashes into the future include love between two bank workers, a
lotto winner, and an unfortunate thief. One and Two are followed with great
scenes filmed at an odd angle in red light that show Lola and Manni in bed
together talking about the outcome of what happened in that particular
20-minute rush. The film also gets my award for the best soundtrack so far this
year. It has plenty of cool techno beats that the Go soundtrack needed. What
chances does this soon-to-be art-house fave have at the Best Foreign Film
Oscar? Not much, but it's still enough to make Run Lola Run the best Foreign
film (and perhaps independent film) so far this year.

Author
Christopher Null
     After all that running, LOLA had better be in shape.  Indeed,
relatively unknown German filmmaker Tom Tykwer has put this film through
such an exhaustive workout that not only is it in tip top condition for
viewing, it'll leave you a little out of breath when it's over.
     A simple RASHOMON meets GO tale of a lost sack of cash and twenty
minutes to find 100,000 Deutsche Marks to replace it, RUN LOLA RUN (aka
LOLA RENNT) follows Lola (Potente), the girlfriend of a hapless guy,
Manni (Bleibtreu), a low-down on the organized crime totem pole. When
Manni foolishly leaves said cash on the subway, Lola figures it's up to
her to fix the situation before Manni does something even more stupid in
the next 20 minutes, before the appointed time for the money drop.
     So she runs.  And how.  Hatching a plan to beg her banker father
for the money, she crisscrosses Berlin on foot.  The genius of LOLA is
not the story, though.  In fact, the plot is pretty simplistic.  It's
Tykwer's use of diverting story lines and clever devices for tying up
loose threads that keep you in constant suspense and curiosity about
what he'll do next.
     Eventually, the 20 minutes run out, and through a force of will (of
sorts), Lola rewinds the clock and plays the scene out again and again 
each time with different consequences.  It's a clever thesis on the
age-old notion that minuscule differences in the way we act at a certain
point in time could have overwhelming consequences down the road.
     For intellectuals, it's a thrilling exercise.  For action- and
visual-lovers, it's pure eye candy.
http://www.lolarennt.de/ (in German)
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
Ivana Redwine
I went into "Run Lola Run" expecting to be dazzled, yet I thought
I would probably hate it anyway since my taste leans toward
films with strong stories and fully developed characters. But I
was pleasantly surprised to find this little German movie to be
emotionally engaging as well as highly entertaining. Although
"Run Lola Run" hasn't redefined my taste, I learned something
about movies and myself after seeing it. There are ways to
create an unforgettable character and a film that sparks with
emotion, even if the story is paper-thin.
"Run Lola Run" is visually stunning and has an energy seemingly
fueled by pure adrenaline. The film is basically a breathlessly
paced thriller with a bit of a love story thrown in. Its inventive
narrative structure also creates a frame for a meditation on the
mutable nature of destiny. Although "Run Lola Run" is stronger on
style than substance and story, it is not without some emotional
resonance and philosophical depth, and it isn't surprising that
it has attracted considerable attention at film festivals. It won
Best Film at the 1999 Seattle International Film Festival and the
Audience Award in the World Cinema category at the 1999 Sundance
Film Festival.
A preamble sets up the film, suggesting that in a world of
infinite possibilities there is only one certainty--the amount of
time something takes. Then Lola (Franka Potente) receives a phone
call from her boyfriend Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu), and he tells
her he is in big trouble. While working for a crime boss, Manni
lost a bag containing 100,000 marks, and he must replace the money
by high noon or he will be killed. Running through the streets of
Berlin, Lola has only 20 minutes to somehow obtain the cash and
get it to her boyfriend in time to save his life.
The film's innovative structure is tiered into three parts, all
starting at the point when Lola gets the call. From there, each
segment branches off, suggesting dramatically different destinies
for Lola, Manni, and others. Even the lives of some of the
passersby are changed forever, and this provides much of the
movie's humor.
Writer/director/co-composer Tom Tykwer's film has an audacious
style. I thought the film's visual aspects and its edgy score
were perfectly matched to the emotional high stakes of the
action. Energetic camera work and the pulse-like beat of techno
music intensify the frantic mood of the film. The editing is
impressive, too, as the movie switches back and forth between
film and videotape, in addition to mixing still photography and
animation with live action.
Even though the story in "Run Lola Run" is a little flimsy, its
characters managed to eventually pull me in, making me care
about their plight, and much of the credit for this must surely
belong to the actors. This is especially true of Franka Potente
as Lola. She has an intense, charismatic screen presence, and
some of the tight shots of her expressive face are particularly
dramatic. I was also impressed by the film's way of showing
different possible fates, as if drawn at random from a multi-
layered time/space continuum of infinite possibilities. "Run
Lola Run" not only entertained me, it made me think and
feel. Not bad for an afternoon at the movies.

Author
Murali Krishnan
(Dialog in German, English subtitles)
This film was released under the English title "Run Lola Run".
A recent series of television beer advertisements pokes fun of the
stereotype of abstract and conceptual tendencies in German literature.
Coming almost as proof of the stereotype is this film -- a nonlinear,
kinetic story filled with action, suspense, color, and music.
The frenetic adventure for Lola and Manni is immediately hinted by the
punk couple's colorful appearance. Lola (Franka Potente) has
florescent hair, florescent clothes, and tattoos. Manni (Moritz
Bleibtreu) is also tattooed, and works as a courier for a small time
gangster. The narrative begins when Lola receives a phone call from a
distraught Manni explaining that he is in deep trouble. Manni was
running an errand for the boss, but he accidentally left the payoff on
the subway. He needs to meet the gangster in a short time, and he will
be in deep trouble if he does not deliver the 100,000 marks. Manni
gives Lola 20 minutes to come up with a plan to raise the money, or
else he will hold up a store to get it. Lola's moped was stolen
earlier, so now she is left without transportation. The only way for
her to get the money and then get to Manni is to sprint across town.
The story is presented in a cleverly nonlinear fashion. The plot is
split between actual events and the imaginations of the characters
without any clear indication beforehand which is which. The narrative
has its share of improbabilities and implausibilities, but these do
not detract from the film because its focus is clearly on the mood and
flow of the story. It attempts to tell story in which imagery (both
visual and sonic) are as important as the actual events. Writer and
director Tom Tykwer intentionally created the imagery first, and then
developed the story to drive it. However, the narrative is not merely
a formula in service to the effects. The story follows multiple
threads of time and explores the ripple effect of decisions made early
in a sequence of events.
Most of the story consists of Lola sprinting through Berlin in a race
against time, trying to reach Manni before he makes a stupid mistake
out of desperation, and somehow getting the money along the way. This
automatically sets a high energy level, which is well regulated by
effective breaks that allow the story elements to emerge and develop.
Although the high adrenaline approach help to camouflage story
weaknesses, it also creates an involved viewing experience. The fact
that it effectively intersperses action and suspense makes it an
engaging film.
Highly recommended. The film is a fast-paced, high-energy, visual and
musical experience. It evokes the feel of an extended music video in
its use of techno music and its mix of live action, cartoon, and
stills. The appeal of the film is more for its imagery than for its
story, which is interesting, but slightly porous. This would be a good
choice for a group of people to watch together as a midnight movie. It
may not appeal to an audience that does not appreciate modern
electronic music, and expects a straight forward plot.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Brandon Stahl
Run Lola Run could have been the new Pulp Fiction. It breathed life
and electricity into a genre that seemed dead, or to most people,
didn't even know existed. To write about it is to remember it's pulse,
it's quick, lightning like photography and sound that rarely stopped,
only to catch it's breath, then moved and ran, ran, ran - until at
the end of the movie you were exhausted. As odd or cliche as this may
sound, I left the theater catching my breath - feeling awkward that I
was walking home rather than running.
Set to techno music, a rhythmic force of dance and action, the movie
was paced like a cheetah running after it's prey. To sit still to it
seemed unnatural. It blends animation, violence, love, revelation and
hysterical action in an 85 minute movie. Five minutes of Lola is more
entertaining than two hours of any recent Hollywood action film. The
story is that Lola's boyfriend Manni, a drug dealer who has
idiotically lost $100,000 on a subway, has 20 minutes to get it back
or face death from the dealers. Lola runs to help him, thinking up
different ways to get the money and avoiding pitfalls.  Lola is a
wonderful character, a new heroine that stands up to old female
cliches, screams and shatters them. It's impossible to forget the
vision of her running - red-hair like a fire on her head, running
through the streets of Germany to save her boyfriends life.
Along the way, we see how split-second decisions and actions affect
the rest of our lives. A boy offers to sell Lola his bike while she
runs. She refuses, then immediately see several snapshots of him being
mugged, beaten up, pity taken on him by a woman, and getting married
to her. Tykwer makes a convincing life in the span of ten
pictures. Snap, snap, snap, snap is your life. Depressing.
This is style merging effortlessly with substance. You couldn't have
one without the other; the plot would die without Tykwer's
speed-induced direction. But the direction is fun and plausible,
instead of being a headache, because the setup presents a good
life-or-death situation. It wastes no time to grab in an
audience. Anything that seems out of place 0r silly is ignored because
the movie goes too quickly to realize what is happening. Snap, snap,
snap and the story jumps from a person who tells Lola to "Fuck Off"
and then shows that woman's life.
That the movie wasn't more of a success in America surprises me. It is
young and paced towards the 15-30 crowd, marketing's money darlings,
the same crowd that producers created half of the past ten years of
movies for. It offered many of the same qualities that made Pulp
Fiction such a breakout.  It was new, or seemed new anyway, with a
direction and flash that inspired countless filmmakers to make direct
photocopies. Audiences didn't seem to mind either, making Pulp Fiction
and it's subsequent ripoffs lots of money.  Lola also seemed to be
fresh, in a different sort of way, but still fresh.
While it was a foreign film, complete with American-hated subtitles,
this could have been overcome with a wide release and any sort of
marketing campaign. Just a few trailers could have sparked
interested. The success of this film was due solely to work of
mouth. It played in independent theaters (the one I saw it in offered
pillows to replace the dilapidated seat cushions). However, Lola
wasn't given a wide release and suffered. What could have been a Blair
Witch Project, was instead made into an Afterlife.

Author
Jamey Hughton
`Run Lola Run', a German import that gained a stellar reputation at the
Sundance Film Festival, is a dazzling and kinetic film that deals with
the subjects of fate and chance. For a berserk and retroactive 81
minutes of non-stop movement, we follow a fiery-haired heroine named
Lola (Franka Potente) as she sprints to save her boyfriend from the
clutches of drug dealers. Lola has roughly twenty minutes to somehow
retrieve 100,000 marks in time to save Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) from
being killed by the dealer. But, in something of a pseudo- `Groundhog
Day' approach, director Tom Tykwer gives Lola three separate chances to
best navigate her way toward the goal. In these trio of episodes, we
gradually learn the unique effects of fate, for even if tiny changes are
made in Lola's journey, the future can be seriously altered.
`Run Lola Run' is an experience like `Fight Club' or `The Matrix', in
that each film takes you through a super-charged wormhole of bending
reality in surreal and exciting ways. In addition, all three movies have
a visual style that separates them from the rest of the pack. `Lola' is
no exception, with stylish quick-flash camera work and cinematography
that serves as scintillating eye candy from the get-go. Tykwer's world
is a landscape of mood and color, with brilliant shades of red and pink
(including Lola's fiery hair) used as effective symbolism throughout.
With it's visual style and mind-blowing pace, `Run Lola Run' is one of
the more invigorating movies of the year. Even more so when considering
the fact it's all stuffed rather nonchalantly into an 81-minute time
period.
As a heroine, Potente does little more than run wildly through the
streets (as the title suggests), but she has a certain flair and
charisma. Her exemplary running form made me wonder if she is actually a
track star. Meanwhile, Bleibtreu does an equally fantastic job of
bringing the dopey but passionate Manni to life. Both actors perform
beyond the call of duty. The dazzling fun comes from predicting what
each episode holds in store for Lola, and the outcome is ultimately
rewarding - several twists and turns are unique and unexpected. The
other characters Lola runs into (both purposely and inadvertently)
include her banker father (Herbert Kraup) and a friendly security guard
(Armin Rohde), but aside from the two leads, no one has more than a few
minutes of screen time. Additional stars that couldn't possibly be
ignored are cinematographer Frank Griebe and editor Mathilde Bonnefroy,
who are both responsible for the film's eye-catching visual elegance.
`Run Lola Run' is subtitled, so be prepared to meet the challenge of
reading the lightning-fast dialogue - occasional sections of it are
especially fast. This is only one of the minor chores involved in
watching. The other is the sense that we never get to really recognize
who the real people are in this hyperactive situation. Most are just
chess pieces in Tykwer's elaborate game of visual presentation, and he
never really makes a significant move with any. But, the average viewer
is likely to be so absorbed in the action that few will realize the lack
of potency in a few elements of the screenplay. A few petty gripes
aside, this film is a wild, exhilarating ride that turns maniacally on
its wheel of originality.
Most people believe foreign films are mainly boring, talky character
studies. Perhaps `Run Lola Run' will recharge their batteries. Not only
does this film offer insight into some intriguing questions of fate and
destiny, it also delivers a white-knuckle visual rollercoaster ride of
overwhelming audacity. Like how the experience must have been for the
persistent title character, `Run Lola Run' is exhausting.

Author
Shane Burridge
Guaranteed big-screen crowd-pleaser from writer-director Tom Tykwer: it's a 
welcome change from the Teutonic gloom we normally get imported from Germany 
for film festivals.  Premise reads like a parallel universe joke, but is 
executed like a music video: Vermilion-haired Lola (Frunka Potente) gets a 
panicky phone call from her boyfriend Manni (Mortiz Bleibtreu).  He needs to 
come up with 100,000 marks in twenty minutes or his life is forfeit.  Using 
only a moment to think what to do, Lola immediately hot-foots it out of her 
apartment to save him.  Energetic, rocket-paced film dispenses with its plot 
in the twenty minutes - as promised - but then whips everything back to 
where it started to replay it a second, and then third time.  It seems that 
everything we do in life is so contrived of the most infinite circumstances 
that this story can replay itself endlessly with infinite conclusions: even 
the people Lola passes in the street have different destinies that are 
compressed to flash by us in seconds.
Despite the threat of assassination that hangs over the proceedings, RUN 
LOLA RUN is very light, and abounds with humorous twists and surprises (one 
hilarious moment finds Lola outside a bank confronted by the police).  
Appropriately, Tykwer has treated the exercise as a game: there is no need 
for us to be concerned about the lives or deaths of these characters as they 
are constantly re-invented.  He also has remixes of the same tune throughout 
the film complementing the 'variations on a theme' storyline.  And, notably, 
the cause-and-effect logic of the story is punctuated by constant collisions 
or near-misses - nearly everyone has a run-in with a car, bicycle, truck, 
ambulance, pedestrian, or stroller as if they were so many hypercharged 
electrons bumping off each other, splitting and merging into their own 
quantum-level parallel universes.  Another admirable element of the film is 
its purely cinematic value - you'll be so caught up in its constant movement 
(of course the only shot of the sky just has to have a passenger jet 
swooping by) that you probably won't even notice the absence of special 
effects.  Using every crane trick, slow-motion, pixillation, camera angle 
and editing device at his disposal Tykwer manages to pull off a highly 
visual treat created almost entirely within camera.  It's prime material for 
some needless, overbudgeted Hollywood remake.  And yes, Lola really does 
run.  Potente must have been exhausted by the time this shoot was over.


Author
Kevin Patterson
RUN LOLA RUN should be required viewing for all Hollywood 
action-movie directors. Here is a film that is as fast-paced and 
exciting as anything I've seen the past couple of years, and not only 
does it establish its breakneck pace without blowing anything up or 
dropping giant pieces of CGI on the screen, but it even creates a 
couple of sympathetic characters and offers some clever bits of 
commentary and insight along the way.
The premise is about as simple as they come. Lola (Franka Potente), a 
young woman living with her parents, receives a frantic telephone 
call from her boyfriend Manni, who has misplaced 100,000 deutschmarks 
of drug money only twenty minutes before he was supposed to deliver 
it to a gangster. Certain that he will be killed if he shows up 
without the money, he plans to rob a grocery store. Lola begs him to 
wait and promises to come up with the money--somehow. Since her 
bicycle has been stolen, she has to run from one location to the next 
as she tries to come up with the cash.
All of this exposition occurs in the first ten or fifteen minutes. 
Following that, writer/director Tom Tykwer shows us three different 
scenarios for what will happen in the next twenty minutes. Suffice it 
to say that all of them involve Lola scrambling between several 
locations, and that in each case it goes right down to the wire 
before we see whether Lola and Manni will escape their predicament or 
not. I would estimate that at least five to seven minutes of each 
scenario are spent on Lola running through the streets, yet these 
scenes do not grow tiresome in the least. Tykwer has a particularly 
flamboyant visual style: his camera rarely sits still, and when it 
does, it's usually watching from an unusual angle. More often, it's 
following Lola on one of her mad dashes, circling rapidly around a 
character in crisis, or even taking a swooping dive
towards the scene. But his methods are varied enough to avoid 
overkill, and the combination of his hyperactive camera work and the 
film's energetic techno score make for a brand of frenetic action 
that is rare even in today's world of hi-tech filmmaking.
The most interesting aspect of RUN LOLA RUN is the way in which 
Tykwer uses the differing scenarios to reflect his ideas about fate 
and chance. In each, there are at first only minor variations, but 
they soon lead to larger ones. For example, in both the first and 
second scenarios, Lola goes to her father's bank to try to get the 
money, but in the second, someone trips her as she runs down the 
stairs. As a result, the timing of her later collision with a 
passerby varies by a second or two, and when she gets to the bank, 
she arrives at a somewhat more uncomfortable moment in her father's 
conversation with his illicit lover. Thus his reaction to her sudden 
appearance is much more immediately hostile, which dramatically 
alters everything that follows. Tykwer also employs a clever gimmick 
whereby he momentarily cuts away from Lola to someone whom she has 
just passed, then shows a quick series of photographs that detail the 
rest of the person's life. These are also sometimes dramatically 
different between scenarios, depending on what exactly happens when 
Lola passes the person.
I've grown somewhat tired of movies that establish their hip 
credentials by making criminals their protagonists, but RUN LOLA RUN 
gets away with it because it manages to portray its characters 
sympathetically without whitewashing their actions. It is when Lola 
and Manni abandon their criminal impulses that they are most 
successful in escaping their predicament, and in one case divine 
intervention even seems to play a role. Two wrongs don't make a right 
in this film, and when Lola or Manni starts threatening violence or 
attempting robbery, things tend to go even further awry as a result.
This is not to say that RUN LOLA RUN is some sort of philosophical 
masterpiece, just that it can lay claim to a certain amount of depth 
underneath its high style. It isn't the most intelligent film of the 
year, but it might be the most entertaining, and it reaches that 
plateau without falling into the category of a guilty pleasure.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Author
Edwin Jahiel
RUN LOLA RUN (LOLA RENNT) (Germany, 1998) *** Written and directed by 
Tom Tykwer. Photography, Frank Griebe. Editing, Mathilde Bonnefoy. 
Set design, Alexander Manasse. Music, Tom Tykwer, Johnny Klimek, 
Reimhold Heil. Animation sequences, Gil Alkabetz. Cast: Franka 
Potente (Lola), Moritz Bleibtreu (Manni), Herbert Knaup (Lola's 
father), Armin Rohde (Mr. Schuster), Joachim Krol ( the tramp Norbert 
von Au), Nina Petri (Mrs. Hansen), Heino Ferch (Ronnie). A Sony 
Pictures Classics release. 81 minutes. R (some merely "cartoonish" 
violence).
Overall applauded (but there are some naysayers too), Run Lola Run 
was probably made when its author was 32. Tom Tykwer had worked in 
TV, and in the realm of features had co-written a script, and wrote 
and directed two well received movies. Whether or not he'll prove to 
have been a "wunderkind" will depend on how much of his past output 
we can see (an unlikely occurrence) and what he will offer us next.
RLR is, at the very least, an interesting novelty, an unclassifiable 
work which is, above all, a stylistic exercise. The place is Berlin, 
though not identified as such and with no landmarks identifiable by 
strangers. Twenty-something Manni, a small-time courier for powerful 
mobsters boy is doing nicely and hopes to be promoted. But then the 
unexpected happens. Having delivered some goods to a buyer, and 
received 100,000 Deutschmarks (at this writing $ 52,356), he leaves 
his plastic bag in the subway when he makes a hurried exit to evade 
ticket inspectors. (OK, we all know that one always should keeps 
holding such loot with clenched fingers, but the film, being a 
fantasy, makes suspension of disbelief easy). If Manni returns 
empty-handed, the top mobster will doubtlessly kill him.
The panicked, hysterical young man phones his girlfriend Lola who 
asks him to wait 20 minutes until she gets there with the money -- 
which she does not have but somehow will get. She leaves her home, 
starts running, and runs and runs and runs.
She's in great physical form, but see above the part about suspension 
of disbelief. This also applies to the ground she covers in just 20 
minutes.
Manni is waiting for her outside a supermarket, which he said he 
would rob if Lola didn't get there on time. We keep track of this on 
a large clock which at the start showed 20 minutes to 12, and 
gradually, inexorably, suspensefully closes in on the fatal hour 
of12.  This is High Noon, Germanicized with a twist!
It's all over in 20 minutes. Which leaves us 60 more of film. What 
the director does with them is to start Scenario One all over again, 
work in--with meticulous and unpredictable spontaneity--small 
variations, increase them to larger ones. Then he  then backtracks 
and ends up with a different ending. The same goes for the 20-minute 
Scenario Three.
If I am cryptic it is that giving details, or even the main lines of 
the story (-ries) would be a killjoy. Especially since the movie's 
maker uses a full array of visual (and sound) tricks, from cartoons 
that connect to the action to split-screen, to pixillation, still 
shots, varying speeds, video, etc.
Lola in the running (and the stopping) process discovers a number of 
new things, mainly about her banker father and about herself. Again, 
I'll be cagey on the subject.
The Berlin of the film seems to be a sparsely populated, minor 
traffic city, which brought to my mind the title of the EricWolfgang 
Korngold opera The Dead City. I am guessing that the film must have 
been on Sundays or holidays. The relative emptiness of the sets makes 
it easy to keep track of Lola. Better yet, she can be always spotted 
by her distinctive, punkish hair painted flaming red-orange. The 
device is essentially similar to Haskell Wexler's, who made the 
classic Medium Cool (1969), a tour-de-force which dealt with the 
actual riots during the famous 1968 Democratic Convention in Chicago. 
Using a great deal of documentary footage, it inserted Wexler's 
actors in the streets and the crowds. For the audience to identify 
immediately Verna Bloom, Haskell had her wear a bright yellow dress 
that always stood out.
How much of a love story RLR may be does not get pictured by overt 
sentiments. There is just one small interlude of the lovers talking 
in bed. Otherwise, it is the extremely kinetic nature of the film 
plus the fact that Lola will do anything to save Manni.
Humor has always been an iffy aspect of Teutonic cinema. It does 
exist here however, but in indirect and/or played-down ways which do 
not get into the cuteness or broad effects that we find in much of 
American films these days. The funniest gag may be of Lola stepping 
out of a bank with a stash of stolen money and facing a regiment of 
heavily armed police. She is taken for a customer and taken out of 
harm's way by solicitous lawmen. And the last line in the movie, 
spoken by Manni, is deliciously ironical.
RLR, beyond showing the fickle finger of fate, has no real depth, 
carries no significant dialogue, no realistic or symbolic weight. But 
it is fresh and inventive, has a good matching musical score, 
excellent camera work, original editing (that's what makes the 
movie), and a fine musical commentary. It has avoided such 
smart-aleck shoals as pedantry, pretentiousness, pseudo-philosophy, 
pseudo-populism, and so on. On the surface, it is a light-weight job 
that could baffle audiences partial to well-made, well-told 
narratives. But it's also very clever.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     It has been suggested that history is a random walk affected by
uncountably many tiny events, most too small to even notice.  Chaos
theory suggests that tiny changes lead to immense differences later in
time.  RUN, LOLA, RUN is a very clever low-budget film from Germany in
which explores this idea.  We see Lola (played by Franka Potente with
day-glow red hair) live the same twenty or so minutes of crisis in
three different ways (though each involves running a great deal).  And
we see how the outcome is different because of those choices.
     Lola has lived with her boyfriend Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) for
about a year when the crisis takes place.  Manni has a job acting as
courier in a drug deal.  In a moment of confusion Manni leaves a bag
with 100,000 Deutsche Marks (roughly $50,000) on a subway.  In a few
minutes Manni will have to face his bosses.  If he is without the
money, he will probably be killed for his mistake.  Rather than do
that, Manni decides he will probably take his chances robbing a
grocery. In a moment of panic he calls Lola and tells her what he is
going to do in just twenty minutes.  If Lola can get to him in twenty
minutes with 100,000 Marks, he will abort his planned robbery.  What
does Lola do?  In three different futures she handles the situation in
three somewhat different ways and things turn out differently because
of her efforts.
     In the opening this film, written and directed by Tom Tykwer,
talks about universal questions and suggests that this film will be
driving at some answers. However any conclusions that RUN, LOLA, RUN
draws are really suspect.  The individual stories are contrived in many
ways.  Some coincidences are acceptable, but there are too many to make
these three futures believable.  In a cinematic version of snapshots we
see the future for some of the tangential characters and it seems very
different based on how Lola runs past the person. No mechanism for what
is causing the differences is shown.  In addition, Lola has some
strange power that can only be called a "magical shriek" that has
powers never explained.  It makes the film a fantasy, in spite of
otherwise realistic treatment of the alternate worlds.  So in some
senses this film is not as good as SLIDING DOORS, another film, far
from perfect, on a very similar theme.  And another problem is that the
timing seems inconsistent between segments.  If the first story took
twenty minutes, they other two should have taken considerably longer.
But even more serious is the fact we do not really get to know the main
characters very well.  Nobody's character is particularly well
developed or made more comprehensible in the course of the film.
     On the other hand, this film effortlessly shifts gears among film,
video, and animation.  The use of the different media probably allowed
for some budget savings in what is clearly a low-budget film.  The only
time that the budget becomes an obvious problem is when the subtitles
in the United States version are white on a white background making
them impossible to read.  The pace of even the opening credits are
enough to leave the viewer panting.  It seems to be an amalgam of many
different cinematic styles, and the film makes that work.  We learn a
great deal about some of the characters by seeing them in the same
situation but handling it three different ways.
     RUN, LOLA, RUN is an unexpectedly provocative film that will be
remembered as a curious novelty, if for no other reason.  I rate it a6
on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Greg King
This grungy, energetic, but off beat German film has been a
huge hit on the festival circuit, and should appeal to audiences
looking for something a little different from the usual bland
Hollywood blockbusters.  Exciting young German director Tom Tykwer
(Winter Sleepers, etc) takes the basic premise of the thriller movie -
the race against the clock scenario - and dazzlingly interweaves it
with a provocative look at how choices, destiny and fate can affect
our lives.
Unfolding at a breathless pace and set to a pulsating
electronic soundtrack, Run Lola Run tells three versions of the same
story.
Lola (wonderfully brought to life by the strikingly red headed
Franka Potente) and her boyfriend Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) are a pair
of punks who have big plans for the future.  But then Manni becomes
involved in a simple courier run for a local drug dealer.  He
unfortunately loses 100,000 marks of drug money on a train, and has
just twenty minutes to find the money before he meets with the
mobster.  Unsure of exactly how she can help, Lola agrees to meet
Manni in twenty minutes, and thus begins a desperate race against
time.
The story unfolds in real time, as Lola races across town to a
rendezvous with an uncertain, pernicious fate.  But things do not go
smoothly for the pair.  The same story essentially unfolds three
times, but in each subsequent telling, chance, coincidental encounters
and accidents conspire to change the outcome.  The fate of the various
characters dramatically changes with each retelling.
The precociously talented Tykwer is clearly in love with the
process of film making and utilises a variety of medium to bring a
sense of kinetic energy to the film.  Tykwer uses a startling
combination of fast and slow motion camerawork, razor sharp editing,
split screen effects, animation, and flash forward montages to good
effect.  The clever structure is propelled along by the dynamic
presence of Potente, winner of the 1998 Bambi media Awards and one of
the most original screen heroines of recent years.
Run Lola Run is indicative of a new, emerging contemporary
German cinema.  This colourful, energetic, vicariously exciting,
brilliantly constructed, and breathtakingly executed film sweeps you
along with its pace and innovation and leaves you breathless and
exhausted at the end.

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

"Run Lola Run" ("Lola Rennt") is the neat little high-energy German
film playing in art houses right now.  The movie has many pluses,
mainly having to do with its energy content and some funny sequences,
as well as some neat visual tricks, but it's somewhat less than it
first appears.
The film is apparently about how contingency affects and effects the
courses of our lives.  The basic plot is that Lola's boyfriend Manni
needs, in 20 minutes, to come up with 100,000 marks he owes a violent
gangster, or else he's dead.  She rushes out to save him by coming up
with the money, running across Berlin.  The same events unfold three
times, each time a little different because, apparently, of the
circumstances of an encounter she has with a dog on the way down the
stairs.  Events unfold differently not just for her but also for
various people she bumps into along the way.  It's the idea of the
butterfly effect on human histories.
"Run Lola Run" is full of energy: there are the running scenes of the
title as she races from place to place, all accompanied by a good
techno soundtrack.  There are few pauses.  The only ones of length are
the interludes between iterations, where the love between Lola and
Manni is fleshed out.  The movie also has a nice sense of humor, with
how several of the random encounters play out.  The cartoons were neat,
too, and I got to find out how little I remember from my college German
classes.  But the heart of the movie is about alternative histories.
One trick that's received notice is the alternate histories of the
people Lola bumps into on her run.  Yes, the point of such divergent
histories arising from whether they're bumped into or narrowly avoided
is the notion that we're all connected by webs of contingency.  A
momentary delay because we missed the walk light may hurl our lives off
in entirely different paths.  Yes, but only in the case of spectacular
accidents, both bad (hit by bus) or good (chance first encounter with
the love of your life).  (I'm under the impression "Sliding Doors"
plays thoroughly with this idea of the split second contingency, though
I haven't seen the movie.  I believe there was also a Kieslowski film
about missing a train along these lines.)  Generally, the momentum of
lives are sufficient so that their trajectories will not be upset by
whether someone brushes by you on the sidewalk or clears you by a good
foot.  These little episodes lack any compelling sense of causality and
exist in a flash-lit vacuum of the filmmaker's imaging.  Why does the
guy on the bike start shooting drugs instead of just saying no, and why
would the permutations of his trivial encounter with Lola send him down
one path and not the other?  The philosophical point about
connectedness contained in the film has the lightweight feel of what a
bright, young college student spins out in a late night conversation
over beer and cigarettes: the apparent heft of the point dissipates in
the light of day.
There's Lola's particular situation, where the causal elements that
determine how each iteration turns out is given more play.  This is
more satisfying to watch, but I feel it's less about little contingent
circumstances affecting how events unfold, and more about how Lola
"solves" the puzzle pieces to make events unfold in the best possible
way (for her).  The caught-in-temporal-loop episodes from Star Trek do
this sort of thing routinely: a certain sequence of actions have to be
undertaken before the whole thing is solved, and the Enterprise escapes
into next week.  And, of course, there's "Groundhog Day".
In some sense, Lola is a less aware version of the Bill Murray
character.  She knows that events have turned out wrong, and she
"corrects" them by force of will and the use of a "play over" button.
The interludes between the iterations that show her love of Manni give
reason for her using her will in this manner.  In a sense, there's no
contingency at all: we know Lola is going to succeed in saving Manni
and herself.

Author
Michael Dequina
_Run_Lola_Run_(Lola_Rennt)_ (R) ****
About halfway through the 81 breathless minutes of
_Run_Lola_Run_(Lola_Rennt)_, a sense of paralyzing fear came over me.  It
had nothing to do with what was unfolding onscreen; rather, what had
frightened me so was the thought of the inevitable fucked-up American
remake, with some "hot" young "star" like Jennifer Love Hewitt as the
titular heroine, whose numerous running scenes would provide ample
showcase for Hewitt's least bland feature--rather, features.
So until that dark day comes--and it will, I'm sure of it (if I thought
of it, at least one Hollywood bigwig already has)--one should savor the
flavor and originality of Tom Tykwer's electrifying German action
thriller, which was perhaps too outré to earn a spot among the Best
Foreign Language Film Oscar.  Not so outrageous, and, admittedly, rather
conventional, is Tykwer's setup: Lola (Franka Potente) must somehow come
up with 100,000 marks in twenty minutes to save her boyfriend Manni
(Moritz Bleibtreu) from mobsters.
Tykwer takes that simple thread and, pardon the pun, runs with it.  It's
been said before, but the statement "it's like nothing you've ever seen
before" couldn't be more true about _Run_Lola_Run_.  He uses every trick
in the book--animated interludes, lightning-fast edits, still frames,
slow motion, you name it--and perhaps even a few more to capture the
adrenalized anxiety of Lola's desperate quest.  My description makes the
film sound like it's all flash and no substance, but what makes Tykwer's
approach so ingenious is how it reinforces and enhances the story rather
than distract from it.
This could not be more the case than with one recurring trick that is
pulled throughout the film.  After Lola encounters certain strangers, the
audience sees that character's ultimate fate through a series of
Polaroids flashed on the screen; without giving too much away, these
destinies change with certain variations in events.  (That may not make
complete sense, but it does once you see the film.)  It's a
tongue-in-cheek, seemingly throwaway narrative adornment, but it reflects
what the film is really about--not Lola, not her boyfriend, not her run;
it's about the different directions life can take, and the little
catalysts that can make big changes.  The point is eloquently made in the
film's pre-credit sequence, where the camera zigzags its way through a
crowd of people, stopping at random people as a faceless narrator
ruminates on how the questions and so-called answers in life are perhaps
one and the same.
That summation makes _Run_Lola_Run_ sound heavyhanded, pretentious, and
perhaps overreaching, but that theme doesn't hit one over the head while
watching the film, which has the sense to take itself
less-than-seriously.  (Case in point: Lola's literally shattering
screams.)  First and foremost, it is a thrill ride, as exciting and
suspenseful an action film as one is likely to see all year long--with a
minimum of violence and bloodshed.  That the film also holds up to a
deeper thematic analysis after the fact makes it an even more impressive
accomplishment.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline:  http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) RUN LOLA RUN is the filmic equivalent of techno dance
music. There is never a gap between tracks and never a slow moment for
rest. It's all rhythm, style, and energy. There's not much you'd call a
melody, but then that's not what this style calls for.
Lola (Franka Potente) gets a phone call from her boyfriend Manni (Moritz
Bleibtreu). The crime they were supposed to be in on together went down
as planned, but Lola wasn't there to give him a getaway ride. Manni had
to take the train into town with the bag of loot. When the cops boarded
the train, he got off out of habit, only he forgot the bag. Now some bum
has the money and Manni has to tell the boss that he lost the money. He
knows for sure he's going to die. 
Lola tells Manni to hold on. She'll be there ASAP to set things right.
She spends the next 20 minutes of film time running through the streets,
stopping only at her father's bank to ask for money. She arrives at
Manni's location just one second too late.
Manni walks into a grocery store to rob it so he can pay the big boss.
The robbery goes bad and the two end up dead. Lola screams "STOP!" and
the movie starts over again.
Lola runs through two more iterations of the same scenario with varying
results. The differences are both subtle and grand. Are the scenarios
alternate universes? Are they imagined? Are they three separate films?
That question is never answered, nor is it important to the enjoyment of
the movie, because it's all about form and style.
It's all form because the film's shape is a carefully structured
trident. It CAN come across as Tykwer's cheap way to avoid having to
write a real plot. But that's like saying there's no melody in techno
dance music. It's not that the plot is MISSING, it's that it was
deliberately de-emphasized.
It's all style because specific shots use stylistic techniques like
video footage, split-screen POVs, and even animation. Even WITHIN the
frame the importance of style is evident in the gothic clocks ticking
off the seconds, and in Lola's flowing, magenta hair and offsetting
green pants. It can come across as haphazard and gratuitous, except that
it permeates every corner of the screen, every second of the film. I'm
confident repeat viewings would reveal a method to Tykwer's stylistic
madness.
Does it sound frustrating? Do you get annoyed at movies that are all
style and no plot? Then don't see it.
Does it sound intriguing? Do you get sucked in by movies that ignore the
rules and make new ones? Then don't miss it.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Ross Anthony
Poor Lola, she just got her moped stolen and now her boyfriend is going to
get rubbed out by the bad guys ... unless ... she can find 100,000 marks and
get it to him in twenty minutes.
Lola does a lot of running. However, that's not what the film is about.
Rather, it's a study of the interaction between would-be strangers and
ourselves, if chance meetings are varied by fractions of seconds. Whew...
what a sentence! Basically, Lola runs her same 20 minute mission three
times. The magic of film allows us to witness the big changes in outcomes,
based on tiny changes in timings. A pretty cool idea.
The director also takes his fair share of creative license in this
production. I guess he figures, "It's not possible to have three tries at
any one instant anyway, may as well give Lola a shrieking scream capable of
breaking glass. And draw a cartoon Lola on occasion to add to the
soft-spoken surrealism." (That's not a real quote -- just me supposin'.)
Franka Potente (Lola) looks great on film. Her appearance matches the
part -- striking red hair, but not distractingly beautiful. Her loser
boyfriend is played so well by Moritz Bleibtreu that I actually care about
him. Still, it's Lola's mission that is the beating heart of this little
film.
Driving the three part marathon is a soundtrack factory sealed with
industrial music. If pounding music sparks headaches for you, stay home or
bring Tylenol.
I loved the opening shot of a soccer ball kicked directly up into the camera
which must have been on a crane (or balloon or helicopter). I loved the
shock Lola finds when she barges in on her poppa for the dough. And I loved
the casino scene. (I'm being vague on purpose.)
Though lacking the solidity of a full feature drama, this colorfully
nerve-wracking art film is an interesting study in chance events with some
fun chili pepper moments.
In German with English subtitles.
Starring Franka Potente and Moritz Bleibtreu.
Writer/Director Tom Tykwer.
Produced by Stefan Arndt and presented by Sony Picture Classics.
Rated R.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Scott Renshaw
     Tom Tykwer's RUN LOLA RUN is pure cinema at its most maddening and
invigorating.  Few films this year will leave viewers as charged from 
experiencing the film medium in the hands of someone who knows how to use
it; few films this year pack so much reckless energy into a tight 81
minutes.  And few films this year not directed by George Lucas will put
more effort into telling a tale about people who don't really matter as
characters.  RUN LOLA RUN is a giddy exercise in overkill combining
splendid bursts of audacity with a largely "who cares" narrative.
     The story opens with an 11:40 a.m. call to Lola (Franka Potente) from
her luckless boyfriend Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu), a smuggler's courier,
about an impending crisis.  It seems that Manni left 100,000 marks of his
boss's money in a bag on the metro, a problem he has little time to solve. 
If Manni and money are not at the designated pickup spot at noon sharp the
same day, Manni is almost certainly a dead man.  That leaves Lola twenty
minutes to track down the cash from her wealthy banker father (Herbert
Knaup), twenty minutes which could end any number of ways depending on the
slightest caprice of chance -- a stumble on the stairs here, a moment's
hesitation there.
     The crux of Tykwer's premise is showing us three alternate fates for
Lola and Manni based on those caprices of chance.  It's a gimmick that
allows him to turn a short film into a feature, but it works better than
you have any reason to expect.  Each segment comes with at least one
surprising twist, the kind of detail that shows Tykwer's rare talent for
being ingenious without being self-congratulatory about his ingenuity.
The most surprising twist of all may be the welcome flippancy in his gloss
on the usually heavy topics of fate and chance.  His best-executed running
gag involves staccato, freeze-frame asides in each segment showing how
Lola's encounters with complete strangers -- changed by a matter of
seconds in each variation -- change those peripheral lives as well.
Tykwer uses his marginalia better than many filmmakers use the entire
page.
     Often, however, it's all just a bit...much.  The collisons of
animation, video, still images and film seem to exist as much because they
can as for any practical reason; surrealist touches like Lola's ability to
shatter glass with a scream are more befuddling distraction than artistic
nuance.  All the busy-ness of Tykwer's business does an effective job of
distracting from just how emotionally weightless it all is.  The quiet
interpersonal moments between Lola and Manni, inserted between the
alternate reality segments, should have been striking for the insight they
provide.  Instead, they're striking because they're about the only chance
you have to catch your breath.
     Still, it's hard to resist a film that maintains such a relentless
pace and squeezes so much pleasure from such a simple concept.  It's also
hard to resist the charisma of Franka Potente, the wild-eyed star whose
furiously pumping legs fuel RUN LOLA RUN.  If there had been the hint of
a person behind that personality, RUN LOLA RUN could have been sheer
brilliance.  Even without that strong human story, it's still the sort of
action-packed crowd-pleaser that makes so many blockbusters look so sadly
bloated.  The sheer momentum of Tykwer's techno-pop-pulsing direction
makes the film an entertaining jolt to the system, even if it's all
ultimately auteurist eye candy.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

RUN LOLA RUN (LOLA RENNT)(director/writer: Tom Tykwer; cinematographer:
Frank Griebe; cast: Franka Potente (Lola), Moritz Bleibtreu (Manni),
Herbert Knaup (Lola's Father), Armin Rohde (Schuster), Joachim Krol
(Norbert von Au), Nina Petri (Mrs. Hansen), 1998-Ger.)
This is not an art movie, yet I saw it an art house theater. It is
perfect for the mall, where teenagers experiencing brain drains can feel
good about being mindless and not have to apologize that this is an
American film, about that old cliche of young lovers relentlessly on the
run. If seen at your friendly mall, you could, at least, be reassured
that there is little chance of anyone trying to sneak it in as an art
film, as was tried in the art house.
RLR should make it apparent that other countries can make obnoxious
films with banal and predictable characters just as readily as Americans
can.There is no substance in this fast food German meal, served up at a
deliciously kinetic speed so that you have no time to think about how
stupid the story is and how depraved the lead characters are, and what a
lousy meal you have just had. The film is as deep as reading a Daffy
Duck comic book or playing a road runner video game or watching a Bugs
Bunny cartoon, and if that entertains you, then perhaps, I could
recommend that you take a look at Run Lola Run, it might be what you are
looking for.
It has the audacity to have in its opening credits a quote from T.S.
Elliot's "Little Gidding", about how the end in life is only the
beginning. In all probability, the blue-bloodied Elliott would not have
cared for this film- and to quote him and then have a film that has
nothing in the world to do with his poem or with the quote, except to
show that even these crass critters who created this film aspire to a
higher art form, is simply a ridiculous attempt by them to try and
achieve credibility when it is not necessary to do so, this film stands
on its own four paws.
The filmmaker also asks the complex questions, Who are Men? Where do
they come from? What is their aim in life? These questions once asked on
screen are, of course, never even attempted to be answered. Though it
would have been good comedic dialogue to have the two leads, Lola
(Franka Potente) and Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu), try to resolve these deep
philosophical questions.
What does take place is a soccer ball being kicked to open the action in
the film, as the movie is supposed to be like a game, with the director
making up the rules as he goes along.
There is a slight plot to this film, Lola's boyfriend for the past year,
Manni, will be killed if he can't come up with 100,000 marks- which he
got from a drug deal, but lost the moneybag on the train to a bum,
blaming it on Lola for not meeting him on her moped as planned (her
moped was stolen). As Manni frantically speaks to her on the phone,
telling her she must now meet him across town in 20 minutes or else this
guy who setup the deal, Ronnie, is going to kill him (now wouldn't that
be a shame). The only other thing to note, is that Lola is the punk
rocker type, with the raggedy-Ann hairstyle of blazing reddish/orange
dyed hair and plenty of tattoos on her body. Manni, not to be undone,
sports a few nifty tattoos himself, while also taking on the punk look.
The fun to this story, if you are going to have any, comes in following
Lola as she makes a run for it through spots that she will revisit three
different times each for 20-minutes and with three different versions,
before the film is over, as any one of the versions could be true or
none of them could be true, it just doesn't matter. Nothing matters,
here. This is a disposable film, like junk food, when done you throw it
in the waste can. The fun is in the run and the cartoonlike character
she has become, and in the reactions she gets from those that she meets
on the way.
After he tells her hysterically on the phone his only chance to stay
alive is to hold up a nearby supermarket, she flings the red phone in
the air, and bolts out of her mother's apartment, as a cartoon of her
flashes on the TV screen and she rushes past her mom who is on the
phone, and next we see her running live on the street. A few of her same
markers will be, a visit to her father's bank, an encounter with an
ambulance and men crossing the street with a pane of glass (boy, what
Harold Lloyd could have done with that vaudeville skit), and a lady in
the street who she keeps banging into. The clock is rewound for each
version, as she starts over again in her mother's apartment, going
through the same routine, but with different impressions and results.
Needless to say, anything goes here; this film does not try to make
sense and it doesn't. Its comedy is on the low end of the totem pole of
comedy, though the old silent comedians, such as Charlie Chaplin and
Buster Keaton did bits similar to this, but they had a logic to their
madcap humor and knew how to tell a story in their comedy. The other
thing this film tried unsuccessfully to do, was show how chance could
change one's life and make things turn out differently. There are so
many films that tried this theme out for size, some successfully like
Rashomon (1950), some modestly successful like Blind Chance (1982),
others less successfully, such as Sliding Doors (1998), but none as
unsuccessful as this one.
At least this subtitled, low-budget film flew by quickly and leaves you
no worst for wear after seeing it... It certainly didn't appeal to me; I
was just not smitten with its attempt to be such a cleverly edited,
jejune summer film. And to mimic one of the few attempts at dialogue in
the movie, when Lola and Manni try to form some sort of communication
with each other to see if their love is for real, and she asks him, "How
does he know that he loves her?" and he replies, "I just know." Well, I
just know I didn't like this film.
Dennis Schwartz: " Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
David N. Butterworth
        The choices we make in life, however small, can have a profound
effect on our destiny.  Or, conversely, these choices make no difference at
all--fate has already determined our ultimate course and every zig and zag
along the way.
        No matter to which of these hypotheses you ascribe, Tom Tykwer's
exhilarating "Run Lola Run" reconsiders--and re-executes--the pitfalls,
obstacles, and decisions its central character faces during the longest
twenty minutes of her life.  And it shows, with amazing dexterity and
creativity, how a talented filmmaker can turn a simple storyline into an
elaborate game of "what if...?"
        As the film opens, a frantic Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) is
telephoning his girlfriend, Lola.  Where was she?  He completed the shady
deal involving some hot Mercedes but Lola wasn't there to pick him up as
arranged.  So he wound up walking to the station but accidentally left the
bag of cash on the train.  Now he has only twenty minutes to deliver the
missing 100,000DM to a bald-headed thug called Ronnie or he'll wind up with
a bullet in his head, or worse.  He needs Lola's help.  Fast.
        Lola tells him to keep calm.  She'll be there.  She'll come up with
something.  "Just wait there for me, Manni" she urges.  "Don't do anything
stupid."
        It's 11:40am and Lola starts to run.  She runs from her apartment
and down the stairs (in animated form).  She runs through the ornamental
garden, down the street, across the plaza, over one railway bridge and
under another, past strolling mothers, bicyclists, and nuns, to the German
Transfer Bank where, she hopes, her father will help her out.  Quickly.
But her father is engaged in a serious conversation with an other woman.
Lola's mother, on the other hand, is back in Lola's apartment muttering
something about shampoo and Sagittarius.
        "Do you want to have a baby with me?" asks the woman of Lola's
father in the grainy, close-up style of a sleazy daytime drama.  "Yes."
This is clearly not a good time to be asking her father for favors, so Lola
bolts again.
        The question, of course, is will Lola get to Manni, cash in hand,
before the clock strikes noon?  In "Run Lola Run," the answer is yes, no,
maybe...  Along with the "Rashomon"-styled what-ifs envisioned by Tykwer,
the relatively-unknown director punctuates his film with some inventive
and-thens, as the denizens Lola encounters on her twenty-minute marathon
have their futures economically summarized in snap-happy Polaroid fashion.
Here Tykwer is non-discriminating in his shrewd stabs at sex, religion,
vice, death, and success.
        As Lola, Franka Potente breezes through the film like the Olympic
flame, her burning orange hair flying behind her as if her whole head were
ablaze.  Lola is a commanding figure in the film and an equally persuasive
runner, driven by a pulsating soundtrack (by Tykwer and two of his
collaborators) that matches her pace for pace, and breath for breath.  The
film has wit, style, and adrenaline to spare and its relatively brief 88
minutes are over all too quickly; one wonders what other fanciful scenarios
the fast-witted Tykwer might have conceived.
        In German with English subtitles, "Run Lola Run" plays like a rock
video with substance.  It's superbly edited, visually thrilling at every
turn, and an absolute rush.

Author
Steve Rhodes
In an age of sardonic titles, writer and director Tom Tykwer's RUN LOLA
RUN (LOLA RENNT) refreshingly means precisely what it says.  Lola,
played with unbounded energy in an utterly captivating performance by
Franka Potente, does exactly that, run almost the entire movie.  And
we're not talking about merely some yuppie jogging -- Lola looks like
she's in training for Olympic sprints.  Well, she would if it were not
for her black combat boots, her sea green, checked pants, her powder
blue tank top and her piece de resistance, hair dyed bright
reddish-orange.
With heavy music that pulsates to the same fast-paced beat as the
storyline, the movie literally flies by you.  One blink in this SLIDING
DOORS on steroids, and you've missed two scenes and three key events.
In fact, the story's funniest parts happen in little subplots that zip
by so fast that they are almost impossible to follow.  Suffice it to say
that this is a enormously fun film that will not put you to sleep -- in
fact it has the effect of several large cups of heavily caffeinated
coffee.
"The ball is round," a man declares in the film's opening.  "The game
lasts 90 minutes.  Everything else is theory."  He then kicks a soccer
ball into the heavens, and movie is off and running like a sprinter
after the blast from a starter's pistol.  With MTV-style jump cuts,
split screens and light-speed zooms, Mathilde Bonnefoy's editing and
Frank Griebe's cinematography are two of the stars of this hyperactive
motion picture, with heavy emphasis on the word "motion."  There is even
an animated version of the ever-running Lola that makes a few
appearances.
As we meet Lola, she is answering the phone.  It seems that she just
missed a very important rendezvous, in which she was supposed to pick up
her boyfriend, Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu), a bagman for some very bad
dudes.  He panicked when she didn't show up and left his bag of 100,000
deutsche marks on the subway, where a homeless man took it.  If Manni
doesn't come up with 100,000 marks from somewhere by the time the bad
guys return in exactly twenty minutes, his life will be in jeopardy.
Lola tells Manni not to worry; she will come up with the money by the
deadline.  He warns her that, if she doesn't, he will rob the
supermarket across the street.  Lola then literally bolts out of her
apartment and down the stairs before she ever has much of a plan in
mind.  One thing is certain, she doesn't have time for slow means of
transportation, such taxis or bikes, instead she runs like the wind,
which gives the whole movie a wonderfully free and energetic spirit.
(One can just imagine the casting of the part.  After sprinting non-stop
for blocks, please halt and read these lines.)
Along the way, we meet a host of minor characters with my favorite being
her father, a banker.  You've heard of families who complain that all
the father ever does is work.  Well, her father has a rather unusual
solution, which is one of many delicious little stories in this black
comedy.  The story is structured into three wholly contained alternative
versions of what could have happened after Lola heard Manni's plea.
If you've ever been inclined to shake your head when you see someone
with hair the color of a piece of fruit, this movie may disabuse you of
that notion.  As Lola, Franka Potente is as likeable and charming as
they come.  Even so, one still wonders what she looks like in her
natural hair color.  One thing is certain; her look in this movie is a
perfect match for her character.
RUN LOLA RUN runs a blisteringly fast 1:21.  The film is in German with
English subtitles.  It is rated R for some violence and profanity and
would be fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
It is so very rare to see a film that is so involving that you're
afraid to look away from the screen for a second. Such a film would
make time stop; it would be an experience that would feel so lifelike
that you'd never look at a movie the same way again. Such a film would
finally show you why movies are made. Not for the benefit of the
filmmaker; but for the benefit of the viewer. Tom Tykwer's "Run Lola
Run" is such a film. It is a film so frenetically fast-paced and
involving that it makes "Go" seem like a Theo Angelopolous melodrama.
"Run Lola Run" starts off with the sounds of a techno beat that
doesn't cease until the movie is through. The film is the product of
music videos, comic books, video games and pure genius. The title
character is first shown as a cartoon in the blistering opening credit
sequence.
Red-haired Lola(Franka Potente) has just recieved a call from her
boyfriend, Manni(Moritz Bleibtreu). Through tears, he tells her that
because she didn't come to pick him up, he owes 100,000dm to a
"friend". The money that he was supposed to deliver was accidentally
left on a subway and stolen by a homeless man. Manni has 20 minutes to
get the money, or he will be killed.
Lola explains that her motorbike was stolen, and she couldn't come to
pick him up. She tells him to wait in the phone booth and somehow she
will get ahold of 100,000dm and get it to him. Full speed ahead, Lola
starts running in whichever direction she can in order to get the
money. Her quest leads her to find out some incriminating family
secrets; and for every person whom she bumps into, a little sequence
is flashed showing what happened to that person afterwards.
This plot, of Lola running to get the money, is repeated three times,
making up the entirety of the film.  Each one of her attempts has a
different, meaningful outcome, but she always can get another
chance(at the beginning of the film, a quote is shown that says "The
end of the game is the beginning of the game").
It's almost impossible to describe in words what a masterpiece "Run
Lola Run" is. The end of the millenium is a perfect time to release
the film in the U.S., because the film is the debut of a whole new
style of film. A film, that is 80 minutes long, stylish, continuously
fast-paced, and impossible not to enjoy. In my book, writer-director
Tom Tykwer has just become the next master of suspense.
Looking back at 1999's films, I noticed that "Run Lola Run" is far
better than anything that has been released. You could combine "The
Matrix" and "Go" and still not come close to the energy that this film
produces. "Run Lola Run" is purely cinematic in its form, and it
pushes the medium of film to its limit. This German gem may just be
this year's foreign film that will become a runaway hit. In essence,
"Run Lola Run" is perfect both in style and in substance.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Homer Yen
I don't know about you, but it's been at least a month since I've seen
a memorable movie.  And I've seen a fair number of films these past few
weeks.  None of them have really stuck in my mind; I can't even recall
the film titles.  Sure, there was the sophisticated Thomas Crown Affair
and the eerie Sixth Sense.  But these screen gems were released back in
mid-August.  For the avid moviegoer, there is a drought of good films
much like the water shortage that we've been experiencing recently in
the Washington DC metro area.  
This week's new releases fail to offer much promise.  Although I
haven't seen any of them yet, the feedback for Stigmata, Stir of
Echoes, and Love Stinks has been generally disappointing.  Gee, what
are intelligent moviegoers like us to do.  Well, let me thank my best
bud, Daniel, for bringing a clever foreign film to my attention.  From
Germany, the film is called `Run Lola Run.'  It's certainly the most
quenching alternative to the recent spate of dry Hollywood offerings.
The story features the rebellious looking Lola.  She's a spunky girl
with flame red hair who has to find a way to help Manni, her
small-time, gangster boyfriend.  Manni has somehow lost a bag of dirty
money that was entrusted to him.  If he can not make the delivery in 20
minutes, he will meet a horrible fate.  Lola begins a mad sprint across
town in a desperate attempt to collect the amount that he lost.  The
storyline is fairly simple.  And that's good, since the movie is in
German with English subtitles.  But the film is more than the frantic
marathon that Lola undertakes.  The filmmaker also introduces a
dimension of what if' and how her actions influence not only her
destiny but others as well.  What if Lola took a little longer to
complete her run?  What if Lola made a left instead of a right?  What
if Lola talked to this person and instead of that person?  Several
scenarios are played out and we can only hope that through some miracle
and random luck that Lola and Manni will live happily ever after.
While the presentation of multiple timelines is not something new
(remember Sliding Doors or even the Back to the Future series), the
presentation was very clever and original.  The first one-third of the
film is a high-octane tour de force that melds high-energy performances
with MTV-chic cinematography.  The feel is undeniably kinetic. 
Strobing images, wild camerawork, and a heavy Euro synth-pop soundtrack
all lend to its youthful appeal.  Meanwhile the dialogue is thoughtful
so that this doesn't become a victim of style over substance.  My only
negative remark is that 90% of the `wow' factor occurs within the first
third of the film.  When you enter the final scenario (there are three
of them), some of the luster begins to quickly wear thin.  Alas, not
even Lola can run that fast forever.  As a foreign film, `Lola' will be
hard to find.  But catch her if you can.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
   RUN LOLA RUN (LOLA RENNT) (Germany, 1998) ***
   ______________________________________________________________________
   Written and directed by Tom Tykwer. Photography, Frank Griebe.
   Editing, Mathilde Bonnefoy. Set design, Alexander Manasse. Music, Tom
   Tykwer, Johnny Klimek, Reimhold Heil. Animation sequences, Gil
   Alkabetz. Cast: Franka Potente (Lola), Moritz Bleibtreu (Manni),
   Herbert Knaup (Lola's father), Armin Rohde (Mr. Schuster), Joachim
   Krol (the tramp Norbert von Au), Nina Petri (Mrs. Hansen), Heino Ferch
   (Ronnie). A Sony Pictures Classics release. 81 minutes. R (some merely
   "cartoonish" violence).
   ______________________________________________________________________
   Overall applauded (but there are some naysayers too), Run Lola Run was
   probably made when its author was 32. Tom Tykwer had worked in TV, and
   in the realm of features had co-written a script, and wrote and
   directed two well-received movies. Whether or not he'll prove to have
   been a "Wunderkind" will depend on how much of his past output we can
   see (an unlikely occurrence) and what he will offer us next.
   RLR is, at the very least, an interesting novelty, an unclassifiable
   work which is, above all, a stylistic exercise. The place is Berlin,
   though not identified as such and with no landmarks identifiable by
   strangers. Twenty-something Manni, a small-time courier for powerful
   mobsters is doing nicely and hopes to be promoted. But then the
   unexpected happens. Having delivered some goods to a buyer, and
   received 100,000 Deutschmarks (at this writing $ 52,356), he leaves
   his plastic bag in the subway when he makes a hurried exit to evade
   ticket inspectors. (OK, we all know that one always should keeps
   holding such loot with clenched fingers, but the film, being a
   fantasy, makes suspension of disbelief easy). If Manni returns
   empty-handed, the top mobster will doubtlessly kill him.
   The panicked, hysterical young man phones his girlfriend Lola who asks
   him to wait 20 minutes until she gets there with the money -- which
   she does not have but somehow will get. She leaves her home, starts
   running, and runs and runs and runs. She's in great physical form, but
   see above the part about suspension of disbelief. This also applies to
   the ground she covers in just 20 minutes.
   Manni is waiting for her outside a supermarket, which he said he would
   rob if Lola didn't get there on time. We keep track of this on a large
   clock which at the start showed 20 minutes to 12, and gradually,
   inexorably, suspensefully closes in on the fatal hour of 12.  This is
   High Noon, Germanicized with a twist!
   It's all over in 20 minutes. Which leaves us 60 more of film. What the
   director does with them is to start Scenario One all over again, work
   in--with meticulous and unpredictable spontaneity--small variations,
   increase them to larger ones. Then he backtracks and ends up with a
   different ending. The same goes for the 20-minute Scenario Three.
   If I am cryptic it is that giving details, or even the main lines of
   the story (-ries) would be a killjoy. Especially since the movie's
   maker uses a full array of visual (and sound) tricks, from cartoons
   that connect to the action to split-screen, to pixillation, still
   shots, varying speeds, video, etc.
   Lola in the running (and the stopping) process discovers a number of
   new things, mainly about her banker father and about herself. Again,
   I'll be cagey on the subject.
   The Berlin of the film seems to be a sparsely populated, minor traffic
   city, which brought to my mind the title of the EricWolfgang Korngold
   opera The Dead City. I am guessing that the film must have been on
   Sundays or holidays. The relative emptiness of the sets makes it easy
   to keep track of Lola. Better yet, she can be always spotted by her
   distinctive, punkish hair painted flaming red-orange. The device is
   essentially similar to Haskell Wexler's, who made the classic Medium
   Cool (1969), a tour-de-force which dealt with the actual riots during
   the famous 1968 Democratic Convention in Chicago. Using a great deal
   of documentary footage, it inserted Wexler's actors in the streets and
   the crowds. For the audience to identify immediately Verna Bloom,
   Haskell had her wear a bright yellow dress that always stood out.
   How much of a love story RLR may be does not get pictured by overt
   sentiments. There is just one small interlude of the lovers talking in
   bed. Otherwise, it is the extremely kinetic nature of the film plus
   the fact that Lola will do anything to save Manni.
   Humor has always been an iffy aspect of Teutonic cinema. It does exist
   here however, but in indirect and/or played-down ways which do not get
   into the cuteness or broad effects that we find in much of American
   films these days. The funniest gag may be of Lola stepping out of a
   bank with a stash of stolen money and facing a regiment of heavily
   armed police. She is taken for a customer and pushed out of harm's way
   by solicitous lawmen. And the last line in the movie, spoken by Manni,
   is deliciously ironical.
   RLR, beyond showing the fickle finger of fate, has no real depth,
   carries no significant dialogue, no realistic or symbolic weight. But
   it is fresh and inventive, has a good matching musical score,
   excellent camera work, original editing (that's what makes the movie),
   and a fine musical commentary. It has avoided such smart-aleck shoals
   as pedantry, pretentiousness, pseudo-philosophy, pseudo-populism, and
   so on. On the surface, it is a light-weight job that could baffle
   audiences partial to well-made, well-told narratives. But it's also
   very clever.
     _________________________________________________________________
